Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-502 Foreign
financial institution. No foreign financial
institution shall receive deposits, lend money, or pay checks, negotiate orders
of withdrawal or share drafts from any principal office, branch, agency,
automated teller machine, or other location in this State, unless expressly
authorized by this chapter, other laws of this State, or federal law; provided
that nothing in this section shall prohibit any foreign financial institution
from participating in the disbursement of cash through an automated teller
machine network or from operating from any location in this State as a licensee
under chapter 454F, or as a real estate collection servicing agent. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 254, §2; am L Sp 2009, c 32, §3; am L 2010,
c 84, §7; am L 2014, c 9, §4]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next